Hawaii statutes.
§147-64 Deposit of moneys. Except for
fees collected by the department pursuant to part VII, all fees, charges,
expenses, civil penalties, and other moneys collected by the department under
this part or any rules prescribed by the department pursuant to this part shall
be deposited with the state director of finance to the credit of the general
fund. [L 1947, c 195, §14; RL 1955, §22-53; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 22; am
L 1961, c 132, §2; am L 1963, c 114, §1 and c 193, §12; HRS §147-64; am L 2003,
c 49, §5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next